District of Columbia statutes.
38-284

Use of Department of Parks and Recreation facilities.

The Department of Parks and Recreation shall, to the extent feasible, partner with child development facilities to allow the facilities to use District recreation centers, fields, playgrounds, and other facilities on occasions that do not conflict with the Department of Parks and Recreation’s existing programming or with on-going community obligations.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 4075, 61 DCR 9990

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 4077, an applicability clause, see § 7016(f)(3) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).